Utah statutes.
53B-8a-113.   Property rights to plan assets.
(1)  The assets of the plan, including the program fund and the endowment
fund, shall at all times be preserved, invested, and expended solely and only
for the purposes of the plan and shall be held in trust for the account owners
and beneficiaries.
(2)  No property rights in the plan shall exist in favor of the state.
(3)  The assets may not be transferred or used by the state for any purposes
other than the purposes of the plan.
